Tennessee, session 114, SB2121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-302(d), is amended by
deleting subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) The applicant is at least twenty-three (23) years of age;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-302, is amended by deleting
subsection (e).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2107, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Subject to § 55-50-302(d), local boards of education and public charter
school governing bodies may adopt policies prescribing the qualifications of school bus
drivers in the interest of the safety and health of school pupils.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2121
011284
- 1 -